Washington statutes.
RCW 33.12.060

Dealings with directors, officers, agents, employees prohibited—Exception.

An association shall make no loan to or sell to or purchase any real property or securities from any director, officer, agent, or employee of an association except to the extent permitted to or from a director, officer, agent, or employee of a federal savings association.

[ 1994 c 256 s 121; 1994 c 92 s 437; 1985 c 239 s 1; 1982 c 3 s 25; 1979 c 113 s 3; 1953 c 71 s 2; 1947 c 257 s 3; 1945 c 235 s 35; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3717-154. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 10; 1933 c 183 ss 51, 53.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 437 and by 1994 c 256 s 121, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1979 c 113: See note following RCW 33.04.020.